Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.135

PASS program—Allocation of funds.

Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, funds shall be allocated as specified in the omnibus appropriations act to support the PASS program through the following programs:

(1) The opportunity internship program under RCW 28C.18.160 through 28C.18.168;

(2) The jobs for America's graduates program administered through the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(3) The building bridges program under RCW 28A.175.025, to be used to expand programs that have been implemented by building bridges partnerships and determined by the *building bridges work group to be successful in reducing dropout rates, or to replicate such programs in new partnerships; and

(4) Individualized student support services provided by a college scholarship organization with expertise in managing scholarships for low-income, high potential students and foster care youth under contract with the office of student financial assistance, including but not limited to college and career advising, counseling, tutoring, community mentor programs, and leadership development.

[ 2012 c 229 s 601; 2011 c 288 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "building bridges work group" was renamed the "graduation: a team effort partnership advisory committee" by 2020 c 114 s 2.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.